Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB355.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.50-336 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Members of the authority shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed
for any actual and necessary expenses incurred by them in the conduct of the affairs
of the authority. The authority shall, upon the appointment of its members, organize
and elect officers. The authority shall choose a chairman and vice chairman who
shall serve for terms of one (1) year. The authority may fix a salary for the
secretary-treasurer, and the secretary-treasurer shall execute an official bond to be
set and approved by the authority, and the cost thereof shall be paid by the
authority.
(2) The authority may employ necessary counsel, agents and employees to carry out its
work and functions and prescribe such rules and regulations as it deems necessary.
(3) The secretary-treasurer shall keep the minutes of all meetings of the authority and
shall also keep a set of books showing the receipts and expenditures of the
authority. He or she shall preserve on file duplicate vouchers for all expenditures
and shall present to the authority, upon request, complete reports of all financial
transactions and the financial condition of the authority. Such books and vouchers
shall at all times be subject to examination by the legislative body or bodies by
whom the authority was created. He or she shall transmit at least once annually a
detailed report of all acts and doings of the authority to the legislative body or
bodies by whom the authority was created.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/27/2026 7:46 AM Jacketed